District of Columbia statutes.
22-3132

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Any device” means electronic, mechanical, digital or any other equipment, including: a camera, spycam, computer, spyware, microphone, audio or video recorder, global positioning system, electronic monitoring system, listening device, night-vision goggles, binoculars, telescope, or spyglass.

(2)

“Any means” includes the use of a telephone, mail, delivery service, e-mail, website, or other method of communication or any device.

(3)

“Communicating” means using oral or written language, photographs, pictures, signs, symbols, gestures, or other acts or objects that are intended to convey a message.

(4)

“Emotional distress” means significant mental suffering or distress that may, but does not necessarily, require medical or other professional treatment or counseling;

(5)

“Financial injury” means the monetary costs, debts, or obligations incurred as a result of the stalking by the specific individual, member of the specific individual’s household, a person whose safety is threatened by the stalking, or a person who is financially responsible for the specific individual and includes:

(A)

The costs of replacing or repairing any property that was taken or damaged;

(B)

The costs of clearing the specific individual’s name or his or her credit, criminal, or any other official record;

(C)

Medical bills;

(D)

Relocation expenses;

(E)

Lost employment or wages; and

(F)

Attorney’s fees.

(6)

“Personal identifying information” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 22-3227.01(3).

(7)

“Specific individual” or “individual” means the victim or alleged victim of stalking.

(8)

“To engage in a course of conduct” means directly or indirectly, or through one or more third persons, in person or by any means, on 2 or more occasions, to:

(A)

Follow, monitor, place under surveillance, threaten, or communicate to or about another individual;

(B)

Interfere with, damage, take, or unlawfully enter an individual’s real or personal property or threaten or attempt to do so; or

(C)

Use another individual’s personal identifying information.

History

Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 502, 56 DCR 7413

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-951.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 502 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 502 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).